Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1503
Record of instruments; form.

The register of deeds shall keep a book or computerized system, as provided by section 23-1517.02, in which every instrument filed for record in his or her office shall be entered at the time of filing the same. Such books or computerized systems shall show the final disposition of such instrument and, if in book form, be as nearly as practicable in the following form:

Where RecordedDate ofDeliveryTheGrantorCharacterBookPageMonthDayYearPartyGranteeofToInstrumentWhomDelivered

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 4, p. 365;

R.S.1913, § 5618;

C.S.1922, § 4945;

C.S.1929, § 26-1203;

R.S.1943, § 23-1503;

Laws 1984, LB 679, § 3.